Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. Registration of Securities; Exemptions; Notice Filing of Federal Covered Securities.
Sec. 45.56.180.
Securities registration by qualification.

A security may be registered by qualification under this section.

A registration statement under this section must contain the information or records specified in AS

45.56.190

, a consent to service of process complying with AS

45.56.650

, and the following information or records:

with respect to the issuer and any significant subsidiary, the name, address, and form of organization of the issuer and subsidiary; the state or foreign jurisdiction and date of organization of the issuer and subsidiary; the general character and location of the business of the issuer and subsidiary; a description of the physical properties and equipment of the issuer and subsidiary; and a statement of the general competitive conditions in the industry or business in which the issuer and subsidiary are or will be engaged;

with respect to each director and officer of the issuer and other person having a similar status or performing similar functions, the person’s name, address, and principal occupation for the previous five years; the amount of securities of the issuer held by the person as of the 30th day before the filing of the registration statement; the amount of the securities covered by the registration statement to which the person has indicated an intention to subscribe; and a description of any material interest of the person in any material transaction with the issuer or a significant subsidiary effected within the previous three years or proposed to be effected;

with respect to persons covered by (2) of this subsection, the aggregate sum of the remuneration paid to those persons during the previous 12 months and estimated to be paid during the next 12 months, directly or indirectly, by the issuer and all predecessors, parents, subsidiaries, and affiliates of the issuer;

with respect to a person owning of record or owning beneficially, if known, 10 percent or more of the outstanding shares of any class of equity security of the issuer, the information specified in (2) of this subsection, other than the person’s occupation;

with respect to a promoter, if the issuer was organized within the previous three years, the information or records specified in (2) of this subsection, any amount paid to the promoter within that period or intended to be paid to the promoter, and the consideration for the payment;

with respect to a person on whose behalf any part of the offering is to be made in a nonissuer distribution, the person’s name and address; the amount of securities of the issuer held by the person as of the date of the filing of the registration statement; a description of any material interest of the person in any material transaction with the issuer or any significant subsidiary effected within the previous three years or proposed to be effected; and a statement of the reasons for making the offering;

the capitalization and long-term debt, on both a current and pro forma basis, of the issuer and any significant subsidiary, including a description of each security outstanding or being registered or otherwise offered, and a statement of the amount and kind of consideration, whether in the form of cash, physical assets, services, patents, goodwill, or anything else of value, for which the issuer or any subsidiary has issued its securities within the previous two years or is obligated to issue its securities;

the kind and amount of securities to be offered; the proposed offering price or the method by which the offering price is to be computed; any variation at which a proportion of the offering is to be made to a person or class of persons other than the underwriters, with a specification of the person or class; the basis on which the offering is to be made if otherwise than for cash; the estimated aggregate underwriting and selling discounts or commissions and finders’ fees, including separately cash, securities, contracts, or anything else of value to accrue to the underwriters or finders in connection with the offering or, if the selling discounts or commissions are variable, the basis of determining them and their maximum and minimum amounts; the estimated amounts of other selling expenses, including legal, engineering, and accounting charges; the name and address of each underwriter and each recipient of a finder’s fee; a copy of any underwriting or selling group agreement under which the distribution is to be made, or the proposed form of an underwriting or selling group agreement whose terms have not yet been determined; and a description of the plan of distribution of any securities that are to be offered other than through an underwriter;

the estimated monetary proceeds to be received by the issuer from the offering; the purposes for which the proceeds are to be used by the issuer; the estimated amount to be used for each purpose; the order or priority in which the proceeds will be used for the purposes stated; the amounts of any funds to be raised from other sources to achieve the purposes stated; the sources of the funds; and, if a part of the proceeds is to be used to acquire property, including goodwill, other than in the ordinary course of business, the names and addresses of the vendors, the purchase price, the names of any persons that have received commissions in connection with the acquisition, and the amounts of the commissions and other expenses in connection with the acquisition, including the cost of borrowing money to finance the acquisition;

a description of any stock options or other security options outstanding or to be created in connection with the offering, and the amount of those options held or to be held by each person required to be named in (2), (4), (5), (6), or (8) of this subsection and by any person that holds or will hold 10 percent or more in the aggregate of those options;

the dates of, parties to, and general effect, concisely stated, of each managerial or other material contract made or to be made other than in the ordinary course of business to be performed in whole or in part at or after the filing of the registration statement or that was made within the previous two years, and a copy of each contract;

a description of any pending litigation, action, or proceeding to which the issuer is a party and that materially affects the issuer’s business or assets and any litigation, action, or proceeding known to be contemplated;

a copy of any prospectus, pamphlet, circular, form letter, advertisement, or other sales literature intended as of the effective date of the registration statement to be used in connection with the offering and any solicitation of interest used in compliance with AS

45.56.120

(17)(B);

a specimen or copy of the security being registered, unless the security is uncertificated; a copy of the issuer’s articles of incorporation and bylaws or their substantial equivalents, in effect; and a copy of any indenture or other instrument covering the security to be registered;

a signed or conformed copy of an opinion of counsel concerning the legality of the security being registered, with an English translation if the opinion is in a language other than English, that states whether the security when sold will be validly issued, fully paid, nonassessable, and, if a debt security, a binding obligation of the issuer;

a signed or conformed copy of a consent of any accountant, engineer, appraiser, or other person whose profession gives authority for a statement made by the person if the person is named as having prepared or certified a report or valuation, other than an official record, that is public, and that is used in connection with the registration statement;

a balance sheet of the issuer as of a date within four months before the filing of the registration statement; a statement of income and a statement of cash flows for each of the three fiscal years preceding the date of the balance sheet and for any period between the close of the immediately previous fiscal year and the date of the balance sheet, or for the period of the issuer’s and any predecessor’s existence if less than three years; and, if any part of the proceeds of the offering is to be applied to the purchase of a business, the financial statements that would be required if that business were the registrant; and

any additional information or records required by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter.

A registration statement under this section becomes effective when the administrator orders that the registration is effective.

A regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may require as a condition of registration under this section that a prospectus containing a specified part of the information or record specified in (b) of this section be sent or given to each person to which an offer is made before or concurrently with the earliest of

the first offer made in a record to the person other than by means of a public advertisement, by or for the account of the issuer or another person on whose behalf the offering is being made or by an underwriter or broker-dealer that is offering part of an unsold allotment or subscription taken by the person as a participant in the distribution;

the confirmation of a sale made by or for the account of the person;

payment under the sale; or

delivery of the security under the sale.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.310

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.190.
Securities registration filings.

A registration statement may be filed by the issuer, a person on whose behalf the offering is to be made, or a broker-dealer registered under this chapter.

A person filing a registration statement shall pay a filing fee established by a regulation adopted under this chapter and consent to service of process as described under AS

45.56.650

.

A registration statement filed under AS

45.56.170

or

45.56.180

must specify

the amount of securities to be offered in this state;

the states in which a registration statement or similar record in connection with the offering has been or is to be filed; and

any adverse order, judgment, or decree issued in connection with the offering by a state securities regulator, the Securities and Exchange Commission, or a court.

A record filed under this chapter or former AS 45.55 within five years preceding the filing of a registration statement may be incorporated by reference in the registration statement to the extent that the record is currently accurate.

In the case of a nonissuer distribution, information or a record may not be required under (i) of this section or AS

45.56.180

unless it is known to the person filing the registration statement or to the person on whose behalf the distribution is to be made or unless it can be furnished by those persons without unreasonable effort or expense.

A regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may require as a condition of registration that a security issued within the previous five years or to be issued to a promoter for a consideration substantially less than the public offering price or to a person for a consideration other than cash be deposited in escrow and that the proceeds from the sale of the registered security in this state be impounded until the issuer receives a specified amount from the sale of the security, either in this state or elsewhere. The conditions of any escrow or impoundment required under this subsection may be established by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter, but the administrator may not reject a depository institution solely because of its location in another state.

A regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may require as a condition of registration that a security registered under this chapter be sold only on a specified form of subscription or sale contract and that a signed or conformed copy of each contract be filed under this chapter or preserved for a period specified by the regulation or order, not to exceed five years.

Except while a stop order is in effect under AS

45.56.230

, a registration statement is effective for one year after the effective date of the registration statement or for any longer period designated in an order under this chapter during which the security is being offered or distributed in a nonexempted transaction by or for the account of the issuer or other person on whose behalf the offering is being made or by an underwriter or broker-dealer that is still offering part of an unsold allotment or subscription taken as a participant in the distribution. For the purposes of a nonissuer transaction, all outstanding securities of the same class identified in the registration statement as a security registered under this chapter are considered to be registered while the registration statement is effective. If any securities of the same class are outstanding, a registration statement may not be withdrawn until one year after the effective date of the registration statement. A registration statement may be withdrawn only with the approval of the administrator.

While a registration statement is effective, a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may require the person that filed the registration statement to file reports, not more often than quarterly, to keep the information or other record in the registration statement reasonably current and to disclose the progress of the offering.

A registration statement may be amended after the effective date of the registration statement. The post-effective amendment becomes effective when the administrator so orders. If a post-effective amendment is made to increase the number of securities specified to be offered or sold, the person filing the amendment shall pay a registration fee established by a regulation adopted under this chapter. A post-effective amendment relates back to the date of the offering of the additional securities being registered if, within one year after the date of the sale, the amendment is filed and the additional registration fee is paid.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.320

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.200.
Notice filing of federal covered securities.

With respect to a federal covered security, as defined in 15 U.S.C. 77r(b) (Securities Act of 1933), that is not otherwise exempt under AS

45.56.110

—

45.56.160

, a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may require the filing of any or all of the following records:

before the initial offer of a federal covered security in this state, all records that are part of a federal registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933), a consent to service of process complying with AS

45.56.650

signed by the issuer, and the payment of a fee established in a regulation adopted under this chapter;

after the initial offer of the federal covered security in this state, all records that are part of an amendment to a federal registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933); and

to the extent necessary or appropriate to compute fees, a report of the value of the federal covered securities sold or offered to persons present in this state if the sales data are not included in records filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission and payment of a fee established in a regulation adopted under this chapter.

A notice filing under (a) of this section is effective for one year commencing on the later of the notice filing or the effectiveness of the offering filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. On or before expiration, the issuer may renew a notice filing by filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission a copy of those records filed by the issuer that are required by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter to be filed and by paying a renewal fee established in a regulation adopted under this chapter. A previously filed consent to service of process complying with AS

45.56.650

may be incorporated by reference in a renewal. A renewed notice filing becomes effective upon the expiration of the filing being renewed.

With respect to a security that is a federal covered security under 15 U.S.C. 77r(b)(4)(D) (Securities Act of 1933), a regulation adopted under this chapter may require a notice filing by or on behalf of an issuer to include a copy of Form D, including the Appendix, as adopted by the Securities and Exchange Commission, and a consent to service of process complying with AS

45.56.650

signed by the issuer not later than 15 days after the first sale of the federal covered security in this state and the payment of a fee established in a regulation adopted under this chapter; and the payment of a fee established in a regulation adopted under this chapter for any late filing.

Except with respect to a federal covered security under 15 U.S.C. 77r(b)(1) (Securities Act of 1933), if the administrator finds that there is a failure to comply with a notice or fee requirement of this section, the administrator may issue a stop order suspending the offer and sale of a federal covered security in this state. If the deficiency is corrected, the stop order is void as of the time of its issuance and a penalty may not be imposed by the administrator.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.330

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.210.
Viatical settlement interests.

Before the sale of a viatical settlement interest, an issuer shall provide a prospective buyer with information that is sufficient to make an informed investment decision. The issuer shall also provide the information to the administrator upon request if the issuer is not otherwise required to file the information with the administrator. In this subsection, “information that is sufficient to make an informed investment decision” includes state-mandated disclosure forms and a disclosure of any significant factors that may affect the outcome of the investment.

Except as may be required in the course of conduct of the responsibilities of the administrator, an issuer of a viatical settlement interest may not disclose to another person the identity of the viator or insured of the insurance policy that is the subject of the viatical settlement interest. The viator may waive this prohibition against disclosure if the waiver is in writing and signed by the viator.

The administrator shall regulate transactions between a viatical settlement provider or person acting as an agent of a viatical settlement provider and a subsequent investor, while the authority of the director of the division of insurance extends to the regulation of viatical settlement contracts under AS

21.96.110

.

In this section,

“viatical settlement contract” has the meaning given in AS

21.96.110(h)

;

“viatical settlement interest”

means the entire interest or any fractional interest in a life insurance policy or in the death benefit under a life insurance policy that is the subject of a viatical settlement contract;

does not include the initial purchase from the viator by a viatical settlement provider;

“viatical settlement provider” has the meaning given in AS

21.96.110(h)

;

“viator” has the meaning given in AS 21.96.110(h).

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.340

; renumbered in 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.220.
Waiver and modification.

The administrator may waive or modify, in whole or in part, any or all of the requirements of AS

45.56.170

and

45.56.190

or the requirement of any information or record in a registration statement or in a periodic report filed under
AS

45.56.190(i)

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.350

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.230.
Denial, suspension, and revocation of securities registration.

The administrator may issue a stop order denying effectiveness to, or suspending or revoking the effectiveness of, a registration statement if the administrator finds that the order is in the public interest and that

the registration statement as of the effective date of the registration statement or before the effective date in the case of an order denying effectiveness, an amendment under AS

45.56.190(j)

as of the effective date of the amendment, or a report under AS

45.56.190(i)

is incomplete in a material respect or contains a statement that, in the light of the circumstances under which it was made, was false or misleading with respect to a material fact;

this chapter or a regulation adopted, order issued, or condition imposed under this chapter has been wilfully violated in connection with the offering by

the person filing the registration statement;

the issuer, a partner, officer, or director of the issuer or a person having a similar status or performing a similar function;

a promoter of the issuer;

a person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by the issuer, but only if the person filing the registration statement is directly or indirectly controlled by or acting for the issuer; or

an underwriter;

the security registered or sought to be registered is the subject of a permanent or temporary injunction of a court of competent jurisdiction or an administrative stop order or similar order issued under any federal, foreign, or state law other than this chapter applicable to the offering; the administrator may not institute a proceeding against an effective registration statement under this paragraph more than one year after the date of the order or injunction on which it is based, and the administrator may not issue an order under this paragraph based on an order or injunction issued under the securities act of another state unless the order or injunction was based on conduct that would constitute, as of the date of the order, a ground for a stop order under this section;

the issuer’s enterprise or method of business includes or would include activities that are unlawful where performed;

with respect to a security sought to be registered under AS

45.56.170

, there has been a failure to comply with the undertaking required by AS

45.56.170(b)(3)

;

the applicant or registrant has not paid the filing fee; the administrator shall void the order if the deficiency is corrected and the order was based solely on the nonpayment of the filing fee; or

the offering

will work or tend to work a fraud on purchasers or would operate to work or tend to work a fraud on purchasers;

has been or would be made with unreasonable amounts of underwriters’ and sellers’ discounts, commissions, or other compensation, or promoters’ profits or participations, or unreasonable amounts or kinds of options; or

is being made on terms that are unfair, unjust, or inequitable.

To the extent practicable, the administrator shall, by a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter, publish standards that provide notice of conduct that violates (a)(7) of this section.

The administrator may not institute a stop order proceeding against an effective registration statement based on conduct or a transaction known to the administrator when the registration statement became effective unless the proceeding is instituted within 30 days after the registration statement became effective.

The administrator may summarily revoke, deny, postpone, or suspend the effectiveness of a registration statement pending final determination of an administrative proceeding. Upon the issuance of the order, the administrator shall promptly notify each person specified in (e) of this section that the order has been issued, the reasons for the revocation, denial, postponement, or suspension, and that, within 15 days after the receipt of a request in a record from the person, the matter will be scheduled for a hearing. If, within 30 days after the date of service of the order, a hearing is not requested and none is ordered by the administrator, the order becomes final. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the administrator, after notice of and opportunity for hearing for each person subject to the order, may modify or vacate the order or extend the order until final determination.

A stop order may not be issued under this section without

appropriate notice to the applicant or registrant, the issuer, and the person on whose behalf the securities are to be or have been offered;

an opportunity for hearing conducted in the manner provided in AS

45.56.690(c)

; and

findings of fact and conclusions of law in a record.

The administrator may modify or vacate a stop order issued under this section if the administrator finds that the conditions that caused its issuance have changed or that it is necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS

45.56.360

; renumbered in 2018, at which time references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.